Tennessee statutes. Title 65 Public Utilities and Carriers
Part 1

Jitney Service

65-19-101. Common carrier — Business declared a privilege.

Any person operating for hire any public conveyance propelled by steam, gasoline, electricity, or other motive power, for the purpose of affording a means of street transportation similar to that ordinarily afforded by street railways (but not operated upon fixed tracks) by indiscriminately accepting and discharging such persons as may offer themselves for transportation along the course of operation, is declared to be a common carrier, and the business of all such common carriers is declared to be a privilege.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 1; Shan., § 3079a199; mod. Code 1932, § 5533; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1901.

Cross-References. Citizen transportation area, § 65-15-115.

Textbooks. Tennessee Jurisprudence, 4 Tenn. Juris., Automobiles, §§ 22, 23; 5 Tenn. Juris., Carriers, § 2, 58.

65-19-102. Permit from city or town required.

It is unlawful for any such common carrier to use or occupy any street, alley or other public place in any incorporated city or town, without first obtaining from such city or town a permit or license by ordinance giving the right to so use or occupy such public place, such permit or license to embody such routes, terms and conditions as such city or town may elect to impose; provided, that no such permit or license shall be granted which does not require the execution and filing of a bond as provided for in § 65-19-103.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 2; Shan., § 3079a200; Code 1932, § 5534; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1902.

65-19-103. Bond required.

Any such common carrier, before operating any public conveyance as aforementioned, in addition to obtaining such a permit or license, shall execute to the state and file with the county clerk of the county in which the business is to be carried on, and renew or increase from time to time as may be required by such city or town, a bond with good and sufficient surety or sureties, to be approved by the mayor of such incorporated city or town, in such sum as such city or town may reasonably demand, in no case, however, in a sum less than five thousand dollars ($5,000) for each car operated, conditioned that such common carrier will pay any damage that may be adjudged finally against such carrier as compensation for loss of life or injury to person or property inflicted by such carrier or caused by the negligence of the carrier.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 3; Shan., § 3079a201; Code 1932, § 5535; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1903.

65-19-104. Use of streets without permit — Operation without bond — Penalty.

Any such common carrier, which shall use or occupy any such public place in any incorporated city or town without first obtaining such a permit or license, or shall operate any such conveyance, without first executing and filing such bond, commits a Class C misdemeanor for each offense. Each day upon which such common carrier so unlawfully uses or occupies any such public place in any incorporated city or town of this state is a separate offense.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 4; Shan., § 3079a202; Code 1932, § 5536; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1904; Acts 1989, ch. 591, § 113.

Cross-References. Penalties for Class C misdemeanors, § 40-35-111.

65-19-105. Authority to grant permits — Restriction.

All incorporated cities and towns are empowered to grant such permits or licenses to such common carriers, and to fix in such licenses and permits the routes, terms, and conditions upon which such common carriers may operate, subject to the above limitations; provided, that no license or permit shall be granted to any such common carrier, without the execution and filing of the above recited bond being required.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 5; Shan., § 3079a203; Code 1932, § 5537; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1905.

65-19-106. Privilege tax.

All such incorporated cities and towns are empowered to impose upon all such common carriers a tax for the exercise of the privilege allowed to be granted by this part.

Acts 1915, ch. 60, § 5; Shan., § 3079a204; mod. Code 1932, § 5538; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 65-1906.

Cross-References. Levy of privilege taxes by cities, § 67-4-501.